Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2500.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Supplemental appropriation; superintendent of public instruction; Arizona empowerment scholarship account program; administration In addition to the appropriation made by Laws 2025, chapter 233, section 31, the sum of $1,000,000 and 12 FTE positions are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the superintendent of public instruction to administer the Arizona empowerment scholarship account program established by section 15-2402, Arizona Revised Statutes.